Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 1.2. Virginia Housing Development Authority Act.
§ 36-55.33:1.
Mortgage loan terms and conditions.

All mortgage loans made by HDA pursuant to §

36-55.31

of this chapter shall be subject to the following terms and conditions:

The ratio of mortgage loan principal amount to total housing development costs and the amortization period of any mortgage loans made by HDA which are federally insured mortgages, in whole or in part, or which are otherwise assisted or aided, directly or indirectly, by the federal government, shall be governed by the rules and regulations provided in or pursuant to the federal government program under which the HDA mortgage loan or part thereof is insured, guaranteed, assisted or aided; but in no event shall such amortization period exceed 50 years.

A mortgage loan made by HDA may be prepaid to maturity after a period of years, and on such terms and conditions, as are determined by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution authorizing, or commitment for, such mortgage loan.

HDA shall have authority to establish and modify from time to time the interest rates at which it shall make mortgage loans and commitments therefor. Such interest rates shall be established by HDA in its sole discretion at the lowest level consistent with HDA’s cost of operation and its responsibilities to the holders of its bonds, bond anticipation notes and other obligations. In addition to such interest charges, HDA may make and collect such fees and charges, including but not limited to reimbursement of HDA’s financing costs, service charges, insurance premiums and mortgage insurance premiums, as HDA determines to be reasonable. No person shall, by way of defense or otherwise, avail himself of any of the provisions of Chapter 3 (§

6.2-300

et seq.) of Title 6.2 to avoid or defeat the payment of any interest or fee which he shall have contracted to pay on any loan or forbearance of money made, directly or indirectly, or assisted in any manner by HDA under or pursuant to this chapter.

Mortgage loans made by HDA to housing sponsors to finance the ownership and operation of housing developments and multifamily residential housing intended for occupancy by persons and families of low and moderate income, pursuant to subdivision (10) of §

36-55.31

, shall be subject to the following terms and conditions in addition to those contained in subsection A of this section:

The amount disbursed with respect to an HDA mortgage loan to a limited profit housing sponsor shall not exceed 95 percent of the total housing development costs and to a nonprofit housing sponsor shall not exceed 100 percent of the total housing development costs. Subsequent to the disbursement of such amount, additional amounts may be from time to time disbursed if the sum of the amount to be so disbursed and the then outstanding principal balance of the HDA mortgage loan does not exceed 95 percent of the market value of the housing development or residential housing as then determined by the Authority. The amortization period of such an HDA mortgage loan shall be as determined by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution authorizing, or commitment for, such mortgage loan; but in no event shall such amortization period exceed 50 years.

The instrument evidencing any such HDA mortgage loan and the mortgage securing any such HDA mortgage loan shall be in such form and contain such terms and conditions as shall be prescribed or approved by HDA. The aforesaid mortgage and instrument evidencing an HDA mortgage loan may contain exculpatory provisions relieving the housing sponsor or its principal or principals from personal liability if deemed desirable by HDA.

With respect to any such HDA mortgage loan made to a limited profit housing sponsor, HDA may require that such limited profit housing sponsor not make distributions in any one year with respect to the housing development or multifamily residential housing financed by such HDA mortgage loan in excess of such percentage of such limited profit housing sponsor’s equity in the housing development or multifamily residential housing as may be determined by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution authorizing, or commitment for such mortgage loan. None of the partners, principals, stockholders or holders of a beneficial interest in such limited profit housing sponsor shall earn, accept or receive a return in any one year with respect to the housing development or multifamily residential housing financed by such HDA mortgage loan greater than his applicable proportion of any such percentage of such limited profit housing sponsor’s equity in the housing development or multifamily residential housing as may be determined by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution authorizing, or commitment for, such mortgage loan. The right to any such limited distribution or return may be cumulative to the extent provided by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution authorizing, or commitment for, such mortgage loan. For the purpose of this section, the terms “distribution” and “return” are intended to mean payments on account of the housing development or multifamily residential housing financed by such HDA mortgage loan resulting from the operation thereof. Any payment to a person or entity who is a partner, principal, stockholder or holder of a beneficial interest in such limited profit housing sponsor shall not be deemed a “distribution” or “return” to such person or entity if the funds with which such payment is made are funds paid or contributed to such limited profit housing sponsor by persons or entities purchasing a beneficial interest in such limited profit housing sponsor. At or after the completion of construction, rehabilitation or improvement of the housing development or multifamily residential housing financed by such HDA mortgage loan, such limited profit housing sponsor’s equity in the housing development or multifamily residential housing shall be established in the manner provided by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution authorizing, or commitment for such mortgage loan. Such equity shall be determined by HDA, at its option, as either (i) the difference between the total housing development costs as to the housing development or multifamily residential housing and the final principal amount of such HDA mortgage loan, or (ii) the difference between the fair market value of such housing development and the final principal amount of such HDA mortgage loan. HDA may thereafter from time to time adjust such equity to be equal to the difference, as of the date of adjustment, between the fair market value of such housing development and the outstanding principal balance of such HDA mortgage loan. HDA may review and regulate a proposed retirement of any capital investment in, or redemption of any stock of, such limited profit housing sponsor in the manner provided by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution authorizing, or commitment for, such mortgage loan.

With respect to any such HDA mortgage loan, HDA may require the housing sponsor and other parties related to the housing development or multifamily residential housing financed by such HDA mortgage loan to execute such agreements, assurances, guarantees and certifications as HDA shall determine to be necessary including, without limitation, agreements between HDA and such housing sponsor and its partners, principals or stockholders to limitations established by HDA as to rentals and other charges, profits, fees, the use and disposition of the real property constituting the site of or relating to the housing development or multifamily residential housing and other property of such housing sponsor, and the use and disposition of franchises of such housing sponsor to the extent more restrictive limitations are not provided by the law under which such housing sponsor is incorporated or organized.

As a condition of any such HDA mortgage loan, HDA shall have the power to supervise the housing sponsor in accordance with the provisions of §

36-55.34:1

at all times during which such HDA mortgage loan is outstanding and thereafter as necessary to preserve the federal tax exemption of the notes or bonds issued by HDA to finance such HDA mortgage loan.

Mortgage loans made by HDA to persons and families of low and moderate income to finance the purchase or refinancing of single-family residential housing, pursuant to subdivision (11) of §

36-55.31

, shall be subject to the following terms and conditions in addition to those contained in subsection A of this section:

The amount disbursed with respect to such HDA mortgage loan shall not exceed 100 percent of the sales price or market value of the single-family residential housing, as determined or approved by or on behalf of HDA. HDA may also disburse additional amounts to finance such closing costs and fees as it may deem necessary or appropriate, and all such disbursements and financings of closing costs and fees subsequent to the enactment of this chapter are hereby validated. The amortization period of such an HDA mortgage loan shall be as determined by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution authorizing, or commitment for, such mortgage loan; but in no event shall such amortization period exceed 50 years. If during the term of the HDA mortgage loan (i) the outstanding principal balance of the HDA mortgage loan is expected to increase to an amount in excess of the original principal balance or (ii) the amount of monthly payments on the HDA mortgage loan will or may be adjusted, HDA shall so notify the applicants prior to the execution of the HDA mortgage loan. Such notice shall describe the terms and conditions under which the outstanding principal balance or the amount of monthly payments, or both, may be so increased or adjusted, and such notice shall be signed by the applicants.

Such an HDA mortgage loan shall be made only after a determination that such a mortgage loan is not otherwise available from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions, and the HDA resolution authorizing, or commitment for, such mortgage loan shall contain such a determination.

The instrument evidencing any such HDA mortgage loan and the mortgage securing any such HDA mortgage loan shall be in such form and contain such terms and conditions as shall be prescribed or approved by HDA. With respect to any such HDA mortgage loan, HDA may require the person or family of low or moderate income to execute such agreements, assurances, guarantees and certifications as HDA shall determine to be necessary including, without limitation, agreements between HDA and such person or family of low or moderate income relating to the use, occupancy, maintenance and sale of the single-family residential housing financed by such HDA mortgage loan and the payment, prepayment and assignment of such HDA mortgage loan.

Mortgage loans made by HDA to housing sponsors or persons or families of low or moderate income to finance the construction, rehabilitation, preservation or improvement of housing developments or residential housing intended, upon completion of such construction, rehabilitation, preservation or improvement, for ownership or occupancy by persons and families of low and moderate income, pursuant to subdivision (12) of §

36-55.31

of this chapter, shall be subject to the following terms and conditions in addition to those contained in subsection A of this section:

The amount disbursed with respect to such an HDA mortgage loan to a limited profit housing sponsor shall not exceed 95 percent of the total housing development costs and to a nonprofit housing sponsor or a person or family of low or moderate income shall not exceed 100 percent of the total housing development costs. Subsequent to the disbursement of such amount, additional amounts may be from time to time disbursed if the sum of the amount to be so disbursed and the then outstanding principal balance of the HDA mortgage loan does not exceed 95 percent of the market value of the housing development or residential housing as then determined by the Authority. Without regard as to whether HDA intends to remain the lender in respect to such mortgage loan throughout the amortization period thereof, the amortization period of such an HDA mortgage loan shall be as determined by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution authorizing, or commitment for, such mortgage loan.

In considering any application for such an HDA mortgage loan, HDA shall give first priority to applications relating to housing developments or residential housing which are or will be well-planned and well-designed, and also shall give consideration to:

The comparative need for housing for persons and families of low and moderate income in the area proposed to be served by the housing development or residential housing;

The ability of the applicant to construct, rehabilitate or improve and market or operate, manage and maintain the housing development or residential housing;

The existence of zoning or other regulations to protect adequately the housing development or residential housing against detrimental future uses which could cause undue depreciation in the value of the housing development or residential housing;

The availability of adequate parks, recreational areas, utilities, schools, transportation and parking; and

The existence of statewide housing plans.

Mortgage loans made by HDA pursuant to subdivision 13 of §

36-55.31

to finance the construction, rehabilitation, preservation or improvement, or ownership and operation, of economically mixed projects or portions thereof and, if any such project is within a revitalization area designated in or pursuant to §

36-55.30:2

, any nonhousing buildings that are incidental to such project or are determined by such governing body of the city or county to be necessary or appropriate for the revitalization of such area or for the industrial, commercial or other economic development of such area shall be subject to the following terms and conditions in addition to those contained in subsection A of this section:

The principal amount of such an HDA mortgage loan shall not exceed 95 percent of the total housing development costs, and the amortization period of such an HDA mortgage loan shall be as determined by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution authorizing, or in the commitment for, such mortgage loan; but in no event shall such amortization period exceed 50 years.

Such an HDA mortgage loan shall be made only if the provisions of §

36-55.30:2

are satisfied.

The instrument evidencing any such HDA mortgage loan and the mortgage securing any such HDA mortgage loan shall be in such form and contain such terms and conditions as shall be prescribed or approved by HDA. The aforesaid mortgage and instrument evidencing an HDA mortgage loan may contain exculpatory provisions relieving a housing sponsor, if any, or its principal or principals from personal liability if deemed desirable by HDA.

The nonhousing buildings shall be financed by such an HDA mortgage loan only if the HDA shall receive a certification from the housing sponsor that a mortgage loan for the financing of such nonhousing buildings is not otherwise available from private lenders upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions.

3.

With respect to any such HDA mortgage loan, HDA may require the housing sponsor, person or family of low or moderate income, contractors, architects, marketing agents, management agents and other parties related to the housing development or residential housing financed by such HDA mortgage loan to execute such agreements, assurances, guarantees and certifications as HDA shall determine to be necessary including, without limitation, agreements between HDA and such housing sponsor and its partners, principals or stockholders or such person or family of low or moderate income to limitations established by HDA as to rentals and other charges, profits, fees, the use and disposition of the real property constituting the site of or relating to the housing development or residential housing and other property of such housing sponsor, and the use and disposition of franchises of such housing sponsor to the extent more restrictive limitations are not provided by the law under which such housing sponsor is incorporated or organized. HDA shall require the housing sponsor or person or family of low or moderate income receiving such HDA mortgage loan, or the construction contractor, or both, to furnish such assurances of completion of the construction, rehabilitation or improvement as determined by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution authorizing, or commitment for, such mortgage loan.

4.

As a condition of any such HDA mortgage loan to a housing sponsor, HDA shall have the power to supervise such housing sponsor in accordance with the provisions of §

36-55.34:1

at all times during which such HDA mortgage loan is outstanding and thereafter as necessary to preserve the federal tax exemption of the notes or bonds issued by HDA to finance such HDA mortgage loan.

5.

With respect to any such HDA mortgage loan, the provisions of subdivisions 2 and 3 of subsection B of this section shall be applicable.

History.

1975, c. 536; 1979, c. 374; 1982, c. 176; 1987, c. 164; 1988, c. 556; 1989, c. 161; 1991, c. 447; 2004, c. 187; 2010, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1975, c. 536, cl. 2 provides: “That nothing in this act shall impair the obligation of the Virginia Housing Development Authority with respect to any bonds, notes or other obligations outstanding on the effective date of this act [March 22, 1975].”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 187 substituted “50” for “fifty” and “multifamily” for “multi-family” throughout the section; and in E, rewrote the introductory paragraph, substituted “95” for “ninety-five” in subdivision E 1, and rewrote subdivisions E 2 and 4.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 794, effective October 1, 2010, substituted “Chapter 3 (§

6.2-300

et seq.) of Title 6.2” for “Chapter 7.2 (§ 6.1-330.47 et seq.) of Title 6.1” in subdivision A 3.

§ 36-55.33:2.
Powers relative to acquisition, development and ownership by HDA of multi-family residential housing.

HDA shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to purchase, acquire, construct, rehabilitate, own, operate, improve, repair, maintain, encumber, mortgage, lease, sell and transfer or otherwise dispose of multi-family residential housing or any part or interest therein for occupancy by persons and families of low and moderate income. For the purposes of this section, HDA may form corporations, joint ventures, partnerships, trusts or other legal entities or any combination thereof, on its own behalf or in conjunction with individuals or other public or private entities, to serve as housing sponsors for multi-family residential housing developments; may acquire, own, encumber, pledge, sell, transfer or otherwise dispose of interests in such housing sponsors; may provide financing and other funding to such housing sponsors; and may exercise all necessary or convenient rights and powers and perform all requisite duties and obligations relating thereto. HDA shall not exercise the powers granted under this section with respect to any multi-family residential housing development, unless HDA makes the following findings:

That there exists a shortage of decent, safe and sanitary housing at rentals or prices which persons and families of low income or moderate income can afford within the general housing market area to be served by the proposed housing development.

That private enterprise and investment have been unable, without assistance, to provide the needed decent, safe and sanitary housing at rentals or prices which persons or families of low and moderate income can afford.

That private sponsors would not be willing, without assistance, to undertake the proposed housing development upon substantially similar terms and conditions.

That HDA has not received notification from both the local housing authority having jurisdiction over the area in which the housing development would be located and the sponsor of such development that it is the preference of both parties that the local housing authority undertake the proposed housing development.

That the proposed housing development will provide well-planned, well-designed housing for persons or families of low and moderate income.

That the housing development will be of public use and will provide a public benefit.

That the housing development will be undertaken within the authority conferred by this chapter upon HDA.

HDA shall also find, in connection with the new construction or substantial rehabilitation by HDA of any proposed multi-family residential housing development, that the governing body of the locality in which such housing development is to be located has not, within sixty days after written notification of such proposed construction or substantial rehabilitation has been sent by HDA to such governing body and to any local housing authority having jurisdiction in such locality, certified to HDA in writing its disapproval of the proposed multi-family residential housing development. The foregoing notwithstanding, no such finding need be made if HDA has received from the governing body its certified resolution approving the proposed housing development.

At least sixty days prior to purchasing, acquiring, constructing or rehabilitating any multi-family residential housing development pursuant to this section, HDA shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality in which such development is to be located. Such notice (i) shall state that HDA intends to purchase, acquire, construct or rehabilitate a multi-family residential housing development or developments in such locality and shall solicit proposals from interested parties for such purchase, acquisition, construction or rehabilitation or (ii) shall identify the multi-family residential housing development or developments to be purchased, acquired, constructed or rehabilitated and shall request comments from the general public with respect to such proposed purchase, acquisition, construction or rehabilitation.

In the event HDA or any legal entity formed by HDA is to construct or rehabilitate a multi-family residential housing development pursuant to this section, HDA or such legal entity shall contract with a private firm for the performance of such construction and rehabilitation, unless HDA determines that no responsible private firm would be willing and able to contract for such construction or rehabilitation at a price necessary for the financial feasibility of such development. HDA or any legal entity formed by HDA shall contract with a private firm or public body for the performance of management services for any multi-family residential housing development owned by HDA or such legal entity pursuant to this section, unless HDA determines that no responsible private firm and no public body would be willing and able to contract for the performance of such management services at a price necessary for the financial feasibility of such development. For the purpose of this subsection, the term “private firm” shall include an individual, joint venture, partnership, stock corporation, trust or other similar business entity legally authorized to perform the construction, rehabilitation or management, as may be applicable, of the proposed multi-family residential housing development.

History.

1987, c. 254; 1991, c. 206; 1996, c. 298.

The 1996 amendment

deleted former subsection E which read: “The power to purchase, acquire, construct and rehabilitate multi-family residential housing pursuant to this section shall expire on July 1, 1997.”

§ 36-55.34.
Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 536.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1975, c. 536, cl. 2 provides: “That nothing in this act shall impair the obligation of the Virginia Housing Development Authority with respect to any bonds, notes or other obligations outstanding on the effective date of this act [March 22, 1975].”

§ 36-55.34:1.
Power to supervise housing sponsors.

Subject to such limitations and conditions as may be agreed to by HDA, HDA shall have the power to supervise a housing sponsor and its real and personal property, at all times during which an HDA mortgage loan to such housing sponsor is outstanding and thereafter as necessary to preserve the federal tax exemption of the notes or bonds issued by HDA to finance such HDA mortgage loan, in the following respects:

Through its agents or employees, HDA may enter upon and inspect the housing development or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings, including all parts thereof, financed by such HDA mortgage loan, for the purpose of investigating the physical and financial condition thereof, and its construction, rehabilitation, operation, management and maintenance, and may examine all books and records with respect to capitalization, income, expenditures and other matters relating thereto;

HDA may supervise the operation and maintenance of the housing development or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings financed by such HDA mortgage loan and may order such alterations, changes or repairs as HDA may deem to be necessary to protect the security of its investment, the public interest, or the health, safety or welfare of the occupants of such housing development or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings;

HDA may order such housing sponsor, or the management agent or other parties related to the housing development or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings financed by such HDA mortgage loan, to perform such actions as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of all applicable laws or ordinances, HDA’s rules and regulations or the terms of any agreement concerning such housing development or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings, or to refrain from doing any acts in violation thereof; and in this regard HDA shall be a proper party to file a complaint and to prosecute thereon for any violations of laws or ordinances as set forth herein;

HDA may prescribe uniform systems of accounts and records for housing sponsors and may require such housing sponsors to make reports, make certifications as to expenditures and give answers to specific questions on such forms and at such times as HDA may deem to be necessary for the purposes of this chapter;

HDA may establish and alter from time to time a schedule of rents and charges for the housing development or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings financed by such HDA mortgage loan, and HDA may establish standards for, and may monitor and regulate, tenant or occupant selection by such housing sponsor;

HDA may require such housing sponsor to pay to HDA such fees and charges as it may prescribe in connection with the examination, inspection, supervision, auditing or other regulation of the housing development or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings financed by such HDA mortgage loan or of such housing sponsor;

In its rules and regulations HDA shall specify the categories of cost which shall be allowable in the construction, rehabilitation, preservation or improvement of a housing development or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings, and HDA shall require such housing sponsor to certify the actual housing development costs upon completion of the housing development or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings, subject to audit and determination by HDA, or shall require such housing sponsor to provide such other assurances of such housing development costs as HDA shall deem necessary to enable HDA to determine with reasonable accuracy the actual amount of such housing development costs; and

The provisions of any agreements which provide for the regulation and supervision by HDA of any housing development or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings shall, when duly recorded among the land records of the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the housing development or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings are located, run with the land and be binding on the successors and assigns of the owner thereof until released of record by HDA.

History.

1975, c. 536; 1987, c. 164; 1991, c. 447; 2004, c. 187.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1975, c. 536, cl. 2 provides: “That nothing in this act shall impair the obligation of the Virginia Housing Development Authority with respect to any bonds, notes or other obligations outstanding on the effective date of this act [March 22, 1975].”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 187 inserted “and any nonhousing buildings” throughout the section and “or residential housing and any nonhousing buildings” in subsection (7), and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 36-55.34:2.
Power to enter into agreements with owners of housing developments eligible for federal low-income housing credits.

HDA may enter into agreements with the owners of housing developments which are or will be eligible for low-income housing credits under the United States Internal Revenue Code.
Any such agreement shall contain covenants and restrictions as shall be required by the United States Internal Revenue Code and such other provisions as HDA shall deem necessary or appropriate.
Any such agreement shall be enforceable in accordance with its terms in any court of competent jurisdiction in the Commonwealth by HDA or by such other persons as shall be specified in the United States Internal Revenue Code.
Any such agreement, when duly recorded as a restrictive covenant among the land records of the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the development is located, shall run with the land and be binding on the successors and assigns of the owner. All references in this section to the United States Internal Revenue Code shall include any amendments thereto and any rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, as the foregoing may be or become effective at any time.

History.

1990, c. 956.

§ 36-55.35.
Terms and conditions of purchase from and sale to mortgage lenders of mortgage loans; loans to mortgage lenders.

Except in the case of a mortgage loan that, when made by the mortgage lender, is to be purchased by HDA, no obligation shall be eligible for purchase or commitment to purchase by HDA from a mortgage lender hereunder if the date of said obligation precedes the date of HDA’s commitment to purchase such obligation by such number of years as shall be determined by HDA and unless at or before the time of transfer thereof to HDA such mortgage lender certifies:

That in its judgment the loan would in all respects be a prudent investment; and

That the proceeds of sale or its equivalent shall be reinvested as provided in subsection F of this section, or invested in short-term obligations pending such reinvestment. However, certification pursuant to this subsection shall not be required in the case of the purchase or commitment to purchase by HDA of a mortgage loan held, insured or assisted by the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

HDA shall purchase mortgage loans at a purchase price equal to the outstanding principal balance; however, discount from the principal balance or the payment of a premium may be employed to effect a fair rate of return which in the opinion of HDA is consistent with the obligations of the HDA hereunder and the purposes of this chapter. In addition to the aforesaid payment of outstanding principal balance HDA shall pay the accrued interest due thereon, on the date the loan or obligation is delivered against payment therefor. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the purchase by HDA of a mortgage loan held, insured or assisted by the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof, in which case the purchase price shall be determined by agreement of HDA and the mortgage lender.

Loans purchased or sold hereunder may include but shall not be limited to loans which are insured, guaranteed or assisted by the federal government or for which there is a commitment by the federal government to insure, guarantee or assist such loan.

HDA shall from time to time adopt, modify or repeal rules and regulations governing the making of loans to mortgage lenders and the purchase and sale of mortgage loans and the application of the proceeds thereof, including rules and regulations as to any or all of the following:

Procedures for the submission of requests or the invitation of proposals for the purchase and sale of mortgage loans or for loans to mortgage lenders;

Limitations or restrictions as to number of family units, location or other qualifications or characteristics of residences to be financed by residential mortgage loans and requirements as to the income limits of persons and families of low and moderate income occupying such residences;

Restrictions as to the interest rates on residential mortgage loans or the return realized therefrom by mortgage lenders;

Requirements as to commitments by mortgage lenders with respect to residential mortgage loans;

Schedules of any fees and charges necessary to provide for expenses and reserves of the HDA; and

Any other matters related to the duties and the exercise of the powers of HDA to purchase and sell mortgage loans or to make mortgage loans or other loans to mortgage lenders.Such rules and regulations shall be designed to effectuate the general purposes of this chapter and the following specific objectives: (i) the expansion of the supply of funds in the Commonwealth available for residential mortgage loans; (ii) the provision of the additional housing needed to remedy the shortage of adequate housing in the Commonwealth and eliminate the existence of a large number of substandard dwellings; and (iii) the restriction of the financial return and benefit to that necessary to protect against the realization by mortgage lenders of an excessive financial return or benefit as determined by prevailing market conditions.

The interest rate or rates and other terms of the loans to mortgage lenders made from the proceeds of any issue of bonds of the HDA shall be at least sufficient so as to assure the payment of said bonds and the interest thereon as the same become due from the amounts received by HDA in repayment of such loans and interest thereon.

HDA shall require as a condition of each loan to a mortgage lender and as a condition of the purchase or the making of a commitment to purchase mortgage loans from a mortgage lender that such mortgage lender within such period of time following the receipt of the proceeds as shall be prescribed by rules and regulations of HDA, shall have entered into written commitments to make, and shall thereafter proceed as promptly as practicable to make and disburse from such proceeds, residential mortgage loans in the Commonwealth of Virginia having a stated maturity of not less than twenty years from the date thereof in an aggregate principal amount equal to the amount of such proceeds. HDA shall not purchase nor make commitment to purchase mortgage loans or obligations from a mortgage lender from which it has previously purchased mortgage loans nor make a loan to a mortgage lender to which it has previously made a loan unless said mortgage lender has either restored or made commitments to restore to its portfolio of residential mortgage loans in the Commonwealth of Virginia, residential mortgage loans having a stated maturity of not less than twenty years from the date thereof in an aggregate principal amount equal to either the proceeds of prior sale or the amount of prior loan to said mortgage lender. HDA may require the submission to it by each mortgage lender of evidence satisfactory to it of the making of such new residential mortgage loans. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the purchase or commitment to purchase by HDA of a mortgage loan held, insured or assisted by the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof or a mortgage loan that, when made by the mortgage lender, is to be purchased by HDA.

HDA shall require that such loans to mortgage lenders shall be additionally secured as to payment of both principal and interest by a pledge of and lien upon collateral security in such amounts as HDA shall by resolution determine to be necessary to assure the payment of such loans and the interest thereon as the same become due. Such collateral security shall consist of (a) direct obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the United States of America or the Commonwealth of Virginia; (b) bonds, debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, satisfactory to the HDA, issued by any of the following federal agencies: Bank for Cooperatives, Federal Intermediate Credit Bank, Federal Home Loan Bank System, Export-Import Bank of Washington, Federal Land Banks, the Federal National Mortgage Association or the Government National Mortgage Association; (c) direct obligations of or obligations guaranteed by the Commonwealth; or (d) mortgages insured or guaranteed, upon terms and conditions satisfactory to the HDA, by the federal government or private mortgage insurance companies as to payment of principal and interest.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1975, c. 536; 1982, c. 101; 1996, c. 298; 2011, cc. 218, 224.

The 1996 amendment

redesignated former subsections (1) through (7) as present subsections A through G; redesignated former subdivisions (1)(a), (1)(b), and (4)(a) through (4)(f) as present subdivisions A 1, A 2, and D 1 through D 6, respectively, in present subdivision A 2, substituted “subsection F” for “subsection (6)” in the first sentence and added the second sentence, and added the last sentences in present subsection B and present subsection F.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 218 and 224, effective March 16, 2011, are identical, and added the exception at the beginning of subsection A and made a related change; inserted “pursuant to this subsection” in subdivision A 2; and added “or a mortgage loan that, when made by the mortgage lender, is to be purchased by HDA” in the last sentence in subsection F.